Massachusetts, session 194th, S553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 21A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
2 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
3  Section 28. (a) There shall be established an advisory council under the executive office 
4 of energy and environmental affairs, known as the urban forest advisory council. Members shall 
5 be appointed by the secretary from public, private, and nongovernmental organizations with 
6 expertise in urban forestry, ecology, arboriculture, landscape architecture, green infrastructure, 
7 demand-side energy efficiency management, public health, and climate change resilience and 
8 mitigation. Such members may include representatives from the following: (i) municipal 
9 arboriculture or tree warden associations; (ii) arboriculture or nursery industry associations; (iii) 

2 of 13 10 urban landscape architecture associations; (iv) demand-side energy efficiency management 
11 organizations; (v) green infrastructure and climate change resilience and mitigation 
12 organizations; (vi) nonprofit organizations with experience in planting or maintaining trees; (vii) 
13 environmental organizations with expertise in energy conservation, energy efficiency, or green 
14 infrastructure building practices; (viii) local affordable housing or community development 
15 organizations; (ix) workforce development programs; (x) municipal departments of public works 
16 responsible for roads, water mains, sewers, and utility infrastructure; (xi) researchers with 
17 expertise in data collection related to natural resources, energy management, and climate change 
18 indicators; (xii) gas companies; (xiii) electric distribution companies; (xiv) nonprofit 
19 transportation organizations with expertise in clean transportation; (xv) nonprofit organizations 
20 with expertise in municipal finance; (xvi) the Metropolitan Area Planning Council, other 
21 regional planning agencies, and the Massachusetts Municipal Association; (xvii) small business 
22 associations; (xviii) organized labor associations; (ix) municipal tree committees; (xx) officials 
23 from the department of conservation and recreation, the department of environmental protection, 
24 and the department of transportation; (xxi) agricultural high schools; (xxii) federally recognized 
25 and state acknowledged tribes within the commonwealth; (xxiii) environmental justice or 
26 community-based organizations; and (xxiv) the University of Massachusetts Amherst Center for 
27 Agriculture, Food, and the Environment. At least one member of the advisory council shall have 
28 a background in ecology and knowledge of native trees in urban settings. 
29  (b) (1) The secretary shall convene the council to provide advice and technical assistance 
30 to participating municipalities, tree-planting organizations, municipal arborists, state foresters, 
31 gas and electric companies, and the department of transportation to ensure sufficient technical 
32 and ecological expertise and oversight in the implementation of the municipal reforestation 

3 of 13 33 program, pursuant to chapter 21P. The council shall use science-based guidelines to determine 
34 urban tree canopy cover, for siting trees and to determine optimum native tree species to ensure 
35 adequate root development and to achieve maximum reduction in consumer energy demand and 
36 removal of greenhouse gas emissions while causing minimal disruption to public infrastructure. 
37 The council shall develop guidelines to the secretary for approving plans submitted by 
38 municipalities pursuant to chapter 21P, and shall advise the secretary on the merits of such plans, 
39 including recommendations for improvement and approval. The council shall develop and 
40 disseminate model tree retention ordinances and by-laws and other model ordinances and by-
41 laws that result in the preservation and expansion of tree canopy and make them available to 
42 public on the website of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs. The secretary 
43 shall provide such resources, expertise, and administrative support as necessary for the advisory 
44 council to carry out its duties and responsibilities. 
45  (2) The technical advice provided by the advisory council shall include, but is not limited 
46 to: (i) approved tree lists, prioritizing the use of hardy, noninvasive and native tree species that 
47 can thrive in the urban environment and the changing climate, and native tree species and their 
48 cultivars that are most beneficial to local pollinator and bird species; (ii) specifications for 
49 planting, installation, and maintenance, including guidelines for planting trees, size and species 
50 of trees, soil volume and supplements, and minimum distances between newly planted trees and 
51 existing infrastructure, including utility infrastructure; (iii) instructions for sufficient watering 
52 and for long-term maintenance to be provided by recipients of trees to ensure survival of such 
53 trees; (iv) technical planning assistance to municipalities and tree-planting organizations; (v) 
54 procedures for inspection and quality control, including inspection for pests and diseases; (vi) 
55 procedures for monitoring and collecting data on tree health and survival; (vii) procedures for 

4 of 13 56 collecting data on energy conservation and climate mitigation benefits from the municipal 
57 reforestation program; (viii) recommendations for workforce development and job training 
58 programs on planting, maintenance, and preservation of urban forests, including collaboration 
59 with secondary and higher education vocational programs; and (ix) any other technical advice as 
60 required by the secretary, in consultation with the department of environmental protection, the 
61 department of conservation and recreation, the department of public utilities, and the department 
62 of transportation. 
63  (c) The secretary and the urban forest advisory council, in consultation with the 
64 department of environmental protection shall develop quantitative and qualitative measures, 
65 using the best available scientific metrics and technology for valuing the contribution that an 
66 urban tree canopy cover makes to: mitigating climate change, including carbon sequestration and 
67 other reductions of greenhouse gas emissions; energy conservation; mitigating extreme heat, 
68 including reduction of the heat island effect; storm water management; drought mitigation; air 
69 quality improvement; benefits to human health; and ecological benefits to local pollinator and 
70 bird species. Such measures may be updated as necessary to reflect current scientific research. 
71  SECTION 2. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 21O the 
72 following chapter:- 
73  CHAPTER 21P 
74  MUNICIPAL REFORESTATION PROGRAM 
75  Section 1. (a) As used in this chapter, the following words, unless the context clearly 
76 requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:- 

5 of 13 77  “Participating municipality”, each municipality in the commonwealth except those with 
78 both a population of fewer than 10,000 residents and tree canopy cover of at least 60 percent; 
79 provided, that a municipality with both a population of fewer than 10,000 residents and tree 
80 canopy cover of at least 60 percent shall have the option to become a participating municipality 
81 by a majority vote of the city or town council, by a majority vote of the board of selectmen or by 
82 resolution of its legislative body, as may be appropriate; and provided further, that a federally 
83 recognized or state acknowledged tribe within the commonwealth shall have the option to be 
84 considered a participating municipality by a majority vote of its tribal council or by resolution of 
85 its legislative body, as may be appropriate. 
86  “Plan”, the municipal reforestation plan. 
87  “Program”, the municipal reforestation program. 
88  “Secretary”, the secretary of energy and environmental affairs. 
89  “Urban tree canopy cover”, the surface area of the land covered by the combined leaves, 
90 branches, and trunks of all standing trees in a given area when viewed from above. 
91  (b) (1) The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of transportation, shall establish a 
92 municipal reforestation program to allow participating municipalities access to funding and 
93 technical assistance to plant and replace trees as well as maintain and preserve healthy trees 
94 within the borders of their communities. 
95  (2) The purpose and goals of the program include, but are not limited to: (i) removing 
96 carbon dioxide emissions from the transportation sector within the municipalities of the 
97 commonwealth through carbon sequestration provided by trees; (ii) improving public health by 

6 of 13 98 mitigating harmful effects of excessive heat and cold; (iii) improving air quality by reducing 
99 levels of particulate pollution in neighborhoods with low urban tree canopy cover; (iv) 
100 strengthening climate resilience by strategically incorporating trees into urban green 
101 infrastructure projects; (v) promoting community, economic, and workforce development by 
102 incorporating green infrastructure into municipal transportation infrastructure and community 
103 planning; (vi) recognizing trees as a key state-wide investment in transportation infrastructure 
104 and workforce development in order to meet the mandates pursuant to chapter 21N; (vii) 
105 prioritizing the inclusion of green, sustainable infrastructure in the development of transportation 
106 infrastructure; (viii) prioritizing the expansion and preservation of the urban tree canopy cover in 
107 environmental justice neighborhoods, including expanding parks and open spaces; (ix) providing 
108 equitable access to funding for rural and urban neighborhoods for opportunities to develop green 
109 infrastructure; (x) maintaining the health of newly planted and existing trees in the urban 
110 environment by providing funding for maintenance and for inspection for invasive pests and 
111 diseases; (xi) reversing the local decline in biodiversity by planting native trees and their 
112 cultivars that are essential to the survival and maintenance of local pollinator and bird species 
113 (xii) prioritizing the expansion and preservation of the urban tree canopy cover in municipalities 
114 to achieve a tree canopy cover of at least 60 percent, where feasible. 
115  Section 2. (a) The urban forest advisory council, pursuant to section 28 of chapter 21A, in 
116 consultation with the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, the secretary of 
117 transportation, and the secretary of administration and finance, shall establish a formula for the 
118 disbursement of funding for the program to each participating municipality in the 
119 commonwealth. Variables and weighted proportions of the formula shall include, but not be 
120 limited to: (i) the total number of road mileage within the participating municipality; (ii) the total 

7 of 13 121 population of the participating municipality; (iii) the total number of employed individuals 
122 within the borders of the participating municipality; (iv) the number of environmental justice 
123 criteria the participating municipality meets, as determined by the executive office of energy and 
124 environmental affairs’ environmental justice policy; and (v) the percentage of urban tree canopy 
125 cover with a greater weighted calculation provided for neighborhoods within a participating 
126 municipality having a tree canopy cover of 20 percent or less. 
127  (b) All costs incurred by the secretary and the participating municipalities for the 
128 planning, implementation and maintenance of the program shall be covered by section 3 of this 
129 act. Funds shall be annually distributed to each municipality, pursuant to said section 3, no later 
130 than August 1st and shall take effect 3 years following enactment of this act. 
131  (c) Each participating municipality shall report annually to the secretary on the status of 
132 the plan and the projects that were completed within the fiscal year and the plans for the 
133 following year. 
134  Section 3. (a) (1) Each participating municipality shall develop a municipal reforestation 
135 plan within 3 years following enactment of this of act, appropriate to the size and needs of the 
136 municipality. In developing a plan, participating municipalities shall follow the guidelines 
137 developed by the urban forest advisory council established under section 28 of chapter 21A and 
138 any other guidelines as determined necessary by the secretary. Participating municipalities may 
139 solicit the technical advice and assistance from: the urban forest advisory council; the department 
140 of transportation; the department of conservation and recreation; the department of 
141 environmental protection; nonprofit tree-planting organizations; local environmental, 
142 sustainability, and pollinator pathway organizations with knowledge of native trees; and 

8 of 13 143 nonprofit transportation organizations; provided, however that such technical advice and 
144 assistance is consistent with the guidelines developed by the urban forest advisory council. The 
145 secretary shall make available other resources as needed by a participating municipality to 
146 facilitate the development of its plan at no additional cost to the participating municipality. The 
147 plan created by a participating municipality shall be broken down into projects to be completed 
148 by the participating municipality and shall follow the project completion prioritization 
149 requirements of this section. 
150  (2) The plan shall include, but not be limited to: (i) an inventory of the participating 
151 municipality’s existing tree canopy cover, using established scientific protocols for determining 
152 tree canopy cover, such as geographical information systems; (ii) an analysis to determine the 
153 optimal sites for planting trees to achieve the goals the program, using established scientific 
154 protocols for site selection; (iii) the current condition of the tree canopy cover of the 
155 neighborhood where the projects will be located; (iv) how the tree species proposed to be planted 
156 are suitable for the specific sites taking into account local environmental conditions and the 
157 preference for native tree species and their cultivars; (v) the expected benefits from expansion of 
158 the tree canopy cover on energy consumption, the heat island effect, wind reduction, storm water 
159 runoff, drought mitigation, and promoting resilience against other impacts of climate change; (vi) 
160 the expected benefits from expansion of the tree canopy cover on public health; (vii) plans to 
161 maintain and provide follow-up care following the planting of trees; (viii) plans to engage 
162 community residents in the planting and maintenance of the trees, including workforce 
163 development programs; (viiii) the relationship of the project to any municipal vulnerability 
164 preparedness program; (x) plans to promote the preservation of existing tree canopy; (xi) a 
165 timeline for completion for each project within the plan while ensuring equitable project 

9 of 13 166 prioritization of projects for environmental justice neighborhoods when attainable; (xii) 
167 certification that tree pits are free of methane leaking from gas pipeline infrastructure; and (xiii) 
168 any other information as may be required by the secretary. Plans shall be submitted to the 
169 secretary to be certified ensuring the plans meet the required criteria of this section. 
170  (3) Trees planted under a certified plan may be planted in public rights of way, public 
171 parks, and on private residential and commercial property, provided that priority for project 
172 completion shall be given to: (i) sites in neighborhoods with low tree canopy cover with first 
173 priority given to sites with less than 20 percent tree canopy cover; (ii) sites in neighborhoods 
174 with levels of particulate pollutants above the levels determined by the department of 
175 environmental protection and the department of public health to be hazardous to human health; 
176 (iii) sites in environmental justice neighborhoods; (iv) neighborhoods that are deemed to be heat 
177 islands; and (v) locations where passengers wait at public transit stations and bus stops and 
178 designated cool corridors for walking and bicycling. Second priority shall be given to sites with 
179 less than 40 percent tree canopy cover. Third priority shall be given to sites with less than 60 
180 percent tree canopy cover and to sites with any other criteria determined by the secretary, in 
181 consultation with the department of environmental protection, the department of conservation 
182 and recreation, and the department of transportation. To achieve optimal tree canopy cover, trees 
183 may be planted by a participating municipality on private residential and commercial property 
184 using funds allocated under sections 2 and 3 of this act, provided, however that the cost of 
185 maintenance for such trees shall be the responsibility of the owner of such property, through 
186 written agreement between the owner of the property and the participating municipality as a 
187 condition of such owner receiving the trees. 

10 of 13 188  (4) Participating municipalities shall update their plans for recertification every 5 years. 
189 In order to revise a certified plan prior to the next recertification, a participating municipality 
190 shall submit the proposed revisions to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs 
191 for approval and recertification by the secretary. The secretary may seek technical advice for 
192 reviewing such proposed revisions from the secretary of transportation and the urban forest 
193 advisory council established under section 28 of chapter 21A. 
194  Section 4. (a) Beginning 3 years following the enactment of this act, each participating 
195 municipality shall annually submit to the secretary for approval a summary of the projects to be 
196 completed from the participating municipality’s reforestation plan within the next fiscal year and 
197 a plan for the next 4 fiscal years. 
198  (b) The total costs of the projects shall include: (i) the cost of purchasing trees 
199 appropriate for the selected sites, including trees purchased as part of a purchasing agreement 
200 pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; (ii) the cost of planting trees; (iii) the cost of preparing 
201 the sites where trees are to be planted; (iv) the cost of infrastructure to create adequate tree pits 
202 and planting conditions, including but not limited to, water collection and water retention 
203 technologies; (v) the cost of making reasonable modifications to adjoining infrastructure; (vi) the 
204 cost of labor; (vii) the cost of community outreach and recruitment of volunteers, including any 
205 stipends provided to volunteers who agree to care for public shade trees in their neighborhoods; 
206 (viii) the cost of necessary machinery used to plant and maintain trees; (ix) the cost of 
207 maintaining trees planted under the plan, including sufficient watering and monitoring of trees 
208 planted on public rights of way, public parks, and other public property; (x) the cost for 
209 subcontractors to perform work that the applicant demonstrates to be beyond its capacity to 
210 perform; (xi) reasonable administrative costs incurred by a participating municipality in planning 

11 of 13 211 and implementing the project and in follow-up maintenance of the trees; (xii) the cost of 
212 maintaining trees not planted under the plan in sites with less than 20 percent tree canopy cover; 
213 and (xiii) other reasonable costs as determined by the secretary. Upon the request of a 
214 participating municipality and where cost effective, the department of conservation and 
215 recreation may provide oversight project management for a project. 
216  (c) Certified projects intending to use funding allocated under subsection (b) of section 2 
217 of this chapter shall not exceed the participating municipality’s total funding allocation for the 
218 fiscal year. 
219  (d) If a participating municipality submits projects for the fiscal year that exceed the 
220 participating municipality’s total funding allocation under subsection (b) of section 2 of this 
221 chapter, the secretary may certify such projects if the participating municipality submits the 
222 corresponding required financial forms, as determined by the secretary, indicating that the 
223 participating municipality has the difference of the costs of the projects acquired through cash or 
224 in-kind contributions from the participating municipality, individuals, nonprofit organizations, 
225 corporations, or other entities. 
226  (e) Funding from public or private sources as authorized by section 9 of chapter 21A may 
227 be acquired by the secretary to finance projects to expand urban forests and the municipal 
228 reforestation program. The secretary shall seek any federal funding that is available to support 
229 urban forests and the municipal reforestation program and the urban forest advisory council shall 
230 assist municipalities, nonprofit organizations, regional planning agencies, and other eligible 
231 entities in identifying and applying for any federal funding that is available to support urban 
232 forests and the municipal reforestation program. 

12 of 13 233  (f) Participating municipalities, when feasible, shall prioritize purchasing trees that are 
234 planted for projects financed under their municipal reforestation plans from nurseries located in 
235 the commonwealth. A participating  municipality may enter into a purchasing agreement with 
236 another participating municipality, a regional group of participating municipalities, a regional 
237 planning agency, or with the department of conservation and recreation to purchase in bulk trees 
238 to be planted under their municipal reforestation plans and other tree planting programs under the 
239 authority of the department of conservation and recreation; provided, however, that the trees 
240 purchased through any agreement come at a reduced cost for all entities. 
241  (g) A participating municipality may enter into an agreement with another participating 
242 municipality, a regional group of participating municipalities, or a regional planning agency to 
243 jointly develop and implement their municipal reforestation plans, including sharing personnel or 
244 equipment or jointly contracting with another entity to perform work that the participating 
245 municipalities demonstrate to be beyond their capacity to perform. 
246  Section 5. The secretary shall report annually, no later than October 1, on the results 
247 achieved by the municipal reforestation program to the governor and to the clerks of the house of 
248 representatives and the senate, who shall forward such report to the president of the senate, the 
249 speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairs of the house and senate committees on 
250 ways and means. 
251  Section 6. The secretary may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to 
252 administer this chapter. 
253  SECTION 3. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
254 is hereby amended by inserting after section 2QQQQQ the following section:- 

13 of 13 255  Section 2RRRRR. There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
256 commonwealth a separate fund, to be known as the Municipal Reforestation Trust Fund, to be 
257 expended, without further appropriation, by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs for 
258 the municipal reforestation program established in chapter 21P and the urban forest advisory 
259 council established in section 28 of chapter 21A. The trust fund shall be credited with: (i) any 
260 appropriations, bond proceeds or other monies authorized by the general court and specifically 
261 designated to be credited thereto; (ii) funds from public and private sources and other gifts, 
262 grants and donations; and (iii) any income derived from the investment of amounts credited to 
263 the trust fund. All amounts credited to the trust fund shall be held in trust and used solely for 
264 activities and expenditures consistent with the public purpose of the trust fund and the ordinary 
265 and necessary expenses of administration and operation associated with the trust fund. All 
266 available monies in the trust fund that are unexpended at the end of each fiscal year shall not 
267 revert to the General Fund, shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year, and 
268 shall not be subject to section 5C.